it: Articoli sportivi > Ricreazione outdoor > Sport acquatici > Sport nautici con traino > Wakeboard > Parti per tavole da wakeboard: Borse e sacche per wakeboard; Attacchi per wakeboard; Pinne da wakeboard; Maniglie per wakeboard; Componenti e pezzi di ricambio per wakeboard; Corde per wakeboard; Pad di trazione per wakeboard
cs: Sportovní potřeby > Outdoorové aktivity > Lodě a vodní sporty > Vlečné vodní sporty > Jízda na vodních prknech > Součásti pro vodní prkna: Tašky a obaly na wakeboardy; Wakeboard – vázání; Wakeboard – ploutvičky; Wakeboard – hrazdy; Hardware a náhradní díly na wakeboardy; Wakeboard – lana; Trakční podložky na wakeboardy
el: Αθλητικά είδη > Υπαίθριες δραστηριότητες αναψυχής > Ναυσιπλοΐα & θαλάσσια σπορ > Θαλάσσια σπορ με ρυμούλκηση > Σέρφινγκ με ρυμουλκούμενο > Ανταλλακτικά wakeboard: Τσάντες και καλύμματα wakeboard; Δέστρες wakeboard; Πτερύγια wakeboard; Λαβές wakeboard; Εξαρτήματα και ανταλλακτικά επισκευής wakeboard; Σχοινιά wakeboard; Pads πρόσφυσης wakeboard
nl: Sportartikelen > Buitenrecreatie > Boten en watersport > Watersporten met motorische aandrijving > Wakeboarden > Onderdelen voor wakeboards: Wakeboardtassen en -hoezen; Bindingen voor wakeboards; Zwemvliezen voor wakeboards; Handgrepen voor wakeboards; Wakeboard-bevestigingsmateriaal en -reparatieonderdelen; Touwen voor wakeboards; Wakeboard-tractiepads
sv: Sportartiklar > Utomhusaktiviteter > Båt- och vattensporter > Vattensporter med draglina > Wakeboarding > Wakeboarddelar: Väskor och överdrag för wakeboard; Wakeboardbindningar; Wakeboardfenor; Wakeboardhandtag; Utrustning och reservdelar för wakeboard; Wakeboardrep; Greppkuddar för wakeboard
es: Equipamiento deportivo > Actividades al aire libre > Deportes acuáticos y navegación deportiva > Deportes acuáticos remolcados > Tablaestela > Piezas de tablas de wakeboard: Bolsas y fundas para wakeboard; Fijaciones para wakeboard; Aletas de wakeboard; Asas de wakeboard; Herrajes y piezas de repuesto para wakeboard; Cuerdas para wakeboard; Almohadillas de tracción para wakeboard
en: Sporting Goods > Outdoor Recreation > Boating & Water Sports > Towed Water Sports > Wakeboarding > Wakeboard Parts: Wakeboard Bags & Covers; Wakeboard Bindings; Wakeboard Fins; Wakeboard Handles; Wakeboard Hardware & Repair Parts; Wakeboard Ropes; Wakeboard Traction Pads
ro-RO: Articole sportive > Recreere în aer liber > Plimbări cu barca și sporturi nautice > Sporturi nautice cu remorcare > Wakeboarding > Piese pentru wakeboard: Genți și huse pentru wakeboard; Legături pentru wakeboard; Aripioare pentru wakeboard; Mânere pentru wakeboard; Piese și accesorii pentru wakeboard; Frânghii pentru wakeboard; Plăcuțe de tracțiune pentru wakeboard
zh-CN: 体育用品 > 户外休闲 > 划船/水上运动 > 滑水用品 > 尾波滑水 > 尾波滑水板部件: 尾波板包与保护套; 尾波滑水板固定器; 尾波滑水板脚蹼; 尾波滑水板手柄; 尾波板五金件与维修零件; 尾波滑水板绳索; 尾波板防滑垫
pt-BR: Artigos esportivos > Atividades ao ar livre > Canoagem e esportes aquáticos > Esportes aquáticos rebocados > Wakeboard > Peças para wakeboard: Bolsas e capas para wakeboard; Fixações para wakeboard; Pés de pato para wakeboard; Alças para wakeboard; Equipamentos e peças de reparo para wakeboard; Cordas para wakeboard; Pads de tração para wakeboard
fi: Urheilutarvikkeet > Ulkoharrasteet > Veneily ja vesiurheilu > Vesiurheilulajit veneen perässä > Wakeboarding > Wakeboardien osat: Wakeboard-laukut ja suojukset; Wakeboardin siteet; Wakeboardin evät; Wakeboardin kahvat; Wakeboard-laitteisto ja varaosat; Wakeboardin narut; Wakeboard-pitotyynyt
pt-PT: Artigos de desporto > Atividades recreativas no exterior > Desportos náuticos e aquáticos > Desportos aquáticos de reboque > Wakeboard > Peças para pranchas de wakeboard: Sacos e capas para wakeboard; Fixadores de wakeboard; Barbatanas para wakeboard; Pegas para wakeboard; Ferragens e peças de reparação para wakeboard; Cordas para wakeboard; Pads de tração para wakeboard
th: อุปกรณ์กีฬา > สันทนาการกลางแจ้ง > กีฬาทางเรือและทางน้ำ > กีฬาทางน้ำแบบลาก > การเล่นเวคบอร์ด > ชิ้นส่วนเวคบอร์ด: กระเป๋าและที่หุ้มเวคบอร์ด; ที่ยึดเท้ากับเวคบอร์ด; ครีบเวคบอร์ด; ที่จับเวคบอร์ด; ฮาร์ดแวร์และชิ้นส่วนซ่อมเวคบอร์ด; เชือกเวคบอร์ด; แผ่นกันลื่นเวคบอร์ด
fr: Équipements sportifs > Loisirs de plein air > Plaisance et sports nautiques > Sports nautiques tractés > Wakeboard > Pièces de wakeboard: Sacs et housses de wakeboard; Fixations de wakeboard; Ailerons de wakeboard; Poignées de wakeboard; Visserie et pièces de réparation pour wakeboard; Cordes de wakeboard; Antidérapants de wakeboard
bg-BG: Спортни стоки > Спортни занимания на открито > Плаване с лодка и водни спортове > Водни спортове с теглене > Уейкборд > Части за уейкборд: Чанти и калъфи за уейкборд; Автомати за уейкборд; Финки за уейкборд; Дръжки за уейкборд; Монтажни елементи и резервни части за уейкборд; Въжета за уейкборд; Подложки за сцепление за уейкборд
nb: Sportsutstyr > Friluftsliv > Båt og vannsport > Trukket vannsport > Wakeboarding > Wakeboarddeler: Bager og trekk til wakeboard; Wakeboard-bindinger; Wakeboard-finner; Wakeboard-håndtak; Deler og reparasjonsutstyr til wakeboard; Wakeboard-tau; Traction-pads til wakeboard
ko: 스포츠용품 > 야외 레크레이션 > 보트 놀이/수상 스포츠 > 견인식 수상 스포츠 > 웨이크보딩 > 웨이크보드 부품: 웨이크보드 가방 및 커버; 웨이크보드 바인딩; 웨이크보드 핀; 웨이크보드 핸들; 웨이크보드 하드웨어 및 수리 부품; 웨이크보드 로프; 웨이크보드 트랙션 패드
hr-HR: Sportska oprema > Rekreacija na otvorenom > Plovidba i vodeni sportovi > Vučni vodeni sportovi > Wakeboard > Dijelovi wakeboard daske: Torbe i navlake za wakeboard; Vezice za wakeboard daske; Peraje za wakeboard daske; Ručke za wakeboard daske; Oprema i dijelovi za popravak za wakeboard; Užad za wakeboard daske; Podloge za trenje za wakeboard
vi: Dụng cụ thể thao > Giải trí ngoài trời > Chèo thuyền và thể thao dưới nước > Lướt ván có thuyền kéo > Lướt ván sóng > Ván lướt sóng trên cao: Túi và vỏ bọc ván wakeboard; Bộ phận gắn ván trượt nước; Vây ván trượt nước; Tay cầm ván trượt nước; Phụ tùng và dụng cụ sửa chữa ván wakeboard; Dây ván trượt nước; Tấm lót chống trượt ván wakeboard
sl-SI: Športna oprema > Rekreacija na prostem > Plovba in vodni športi > Vlečni športi na vodi > Deskanje na vodi > Deli za deskanje na vodi: Torbe in prevleke za wakeboard deske; Vezi za deskanje na vodi; Plavutke za deskanje na vodi; Ročke za deskanje na vodi; Montažni in rezervni deli za wakeboard deske; Vrvi za deskanje na vodi; Protizdrsne podloge za wakeboard deske
lt-LT: Sporto prekės > Poilsis lauke > Plaukiojimas valtimis ir vandens sportas > Velkamasis vandens sportas > Vandenlenčių sportas > Vandenlenčių dalys: Wakeboard krepšiai ir užvalkalai; Vandenlenčių apkaustai; Vandenlenčių kiliai; Vandenlenčių rankenos; Wakeboard techninė įranga ir remonto dalys; Vandenlenčių lynai; Wakeboard sukibimo padeliai
ja: スポーツ用品 > 屋外レクリエーション > ウォータースポーツ・アクティビティ > トーイングアクティビティ > ウェイクボード用品 > ウェイクボード用パーツ: ウェイクボードバッグ・カバー; ウェイクボード用ビンディング; ウェイクボード用フィン; ウェイクボード用ハンドル; ウェイクボード用ハードウェア・修理パーツ; ウェイクボード用ロープ; ウェイクボード用トラクションパッド
sk-SK: Športový tovar > Exteriérové rekreakčné športy > Člnkovanie a vodné športy > Vlečné vodné športy > Wakeboarding > Diely na wakeboard: Tašky a obaly na wakeboardy; Viazanie na wakeboard; Plutvy na wakeboard; Rúčky na wakeboard; Príslušenstvo a diely na opravu wakeboardu; Laná na wakeboard; Trakčné podložky na wakeboard
zh-TW: 體育用品 > 室外休閒 > 水上運動 > 纜繩滑水 > 寬板滑水 > 滑水板零件: 寬板滑水板袋與保護套; 滑水板腳套; 滑水板舵; 滑水板手把; 寬板滑水硬體與維修零件; 滑水板繩; 寬板滑水防滑墊
da: Sportsartikler > Friluftsliv > Sejling og vandsport > Vandsport, hvor man trækkes > Wakeboarding > Dele til wakeboards: Tasker og betræk til wakeboards; Wakeboard-bindinger; Wakeboard-finner; Wakeboard-håndtag; Hardware og reservedele til wakeboards; Wakeboard-reb; Traction pads til wakeboards
ru: Спортивные товары > Активный отдых на открытом воздухе > Гребля и водные виды спорта > Катание по воде за катером > Вейкбординг > Детали для вейкбордов: Сумки и чехлы для вейкбордов; Крепления для вейкбордов; Плавники для вейкбордов; Ручки для вейкбордов; Крепеж и запчасти для вейкбордов; Фалы для вейкбордов; Противоскользящие накладки для вейкбордов
de: Sportartikel > Outdoor-Aktivitäten > Boot- & Wassersport > Seilgebundene Wassersportarten > Wakeboarding > Wakeboard-Ersatzteile: Wakeboard-Taschen & -Hüllen; Wakeboard-Bindungen; Wakeboard-Flossen; Wakeboard-Griffe; Wakeboard-Hardware & -Ersatzteile; Wakeboard-Seile; Wakeboard-Traction-Pads
hu: Sportszerek > Szabadtéri kikapcsolódás > Csónakázás és vízi sportok > Vontatott vízi sportok > Wakeboardozás > Wakeboard-alkatrészek: Wakeboard-táskák és -huzatok; Wakeboard-kötések; Wakeboard-uszonyok; Wakeboard-fogantyúk; Wakeboard-szerelvények és javítóalkatrészek; Wakeboard-kötelek; Wakeboard csúszásgátló betétek
pl: Sprzęt sportowy > Rekreacja na świeżym powietrzu > Żegluga i sporty wodne > Sporty wodne holowane > Wakeboarding > Części do wakeboardingu: Torby i pokrowce do wakeboardingu; Wiązania do wakeboardingu; Płetwy do wakeboardu; Uchwyty do wakeboardu; Osprzęt i części naprawcze do wakeboardingu; Linki do wakeboardu; Pady trakcyjne do wakeboardingu
tr: Spor Malzemeleri > Açık Hava Etkinlikleri > Kayıkçılık ve Su Sporları > Çekmeli Su Sporları > Wakeboard Sporu > Su Kayağı Parçaları: Wakeboard çantaları ve kılıfları; Su Kayağı Bağlamaları; Su Kayağı Yüzgeçleri; Su Kayağı Kolları; Wakeboard donanım ve tamir parçaları; Su Kayağı Halatları; Wakeboard kaymaz pedleri